Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Insuring State Property

56.065.
Definitions for KRS 56.070 to 56.180.

As used in KRS

56.070

to

56.180

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Subject of risk” means any or all property reasonably considered to be subject to loss or damage by any single occurrence of any event insured against.

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 192, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 57; 1982, ch. 406, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 39, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Office of Insurance, KRS

304.2-010

.

56.070.
Finance and Administration Cabinet determines state property to be insured through state fire and tornado insurance fund — Exceptions.

The cabinet shall determine which state property shall be insured against loss by fire and other hazards. The cabinet shall insure with a responsible company or companies authorized to do business in Kentucky all property financed under a statutory amortization plan, to the extent of the lien indebtedness upon the property or to the extent of its reasonable value, whichever is the lesser.

Any officer or agent of the state having control or custody of any property belonging to or controlled or used by the state or any agency of the state may, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, from the funds allotted to such agency, purchase insurance of an additional kind or kinds which cannot properly be covered in the state fire and tornado insurance fund.

History.

4636-21, 4636-33: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 192, § 2; 1982, ch. 406, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 40, effective July 15, 2010.

56.080.
Appraisal and valuation of state property.

Before July 1 of each year, the cabinet shall reconsider its appraisal and valuation of public buildings and personal property belonging to or under the control and use of the state or any state agency, and shall certify any changes in value to the agency that has the custody or control of the property. The appraisal and valuation shall equal the amount that the cabinet deems necessary to replace the property at the time of the appraisal, which may be less actual depreciation.

History.

4636-22, 4636-23; 1998, ch. 483, § 33, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 41, effective July 15, 2010.

56.090.
Rate of premium, how fixed and certified.

Before July 1 of each year the cabinet shall fix, upon each public building and upon each class of personal property belonging to or controlled or used by the state or any agency of the state, the rate of premium that the cabinet deems to be the average rate charged by responsible insurance companies doing business in this state for insurance against damage by fire and other hazards upon property of like kind and degree of risk. The premium and insurance shall be calculated upon ninety percent (90%) of the valuation. Before July 1 of each year the cabinet shall certify to the State Treasurer the premium to be charged against each agency of the state.

History.

4636-24, 4636-25: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 192, § 3; 1982, ch. 406, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 42, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Commonwealth Credit Union could properly purchase insurance covering a credit union building, when such building was completed, from the State Fire and Tornado Insurance Fund; such building, in terms of KRS 56.070(1), qualified as property “used by the state or any agency of the state.” The premium to be charged against the Commonwealth Credit Union would be determined by the Department of Insurance, pursuant to this section and the premium chargeable to the credit union could be taken out of the state budget appropriations to the credit union, the profits of the credit union, or a combination of both, pursuant to KRS

56.100

.

OAG 84-80

.

56.095.
KRS Chapter 45A applicable to fire and tornado insurance contracts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, KRS Chapter 45A shall apply to fire and tornado insurance contracts entered into by the cabinet, except as provided in KRS

45A.022

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 406, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 43, effective July 15, 2010.

56.100.
State fire and tornado insurance fund — Payments into — Limit on risk — Certificate of terms and conditions.

Each fiscal year the State Treasurer shall deduct from any funds in the Treasury payable to an agency for the care and maintenance of public buildings or property, an amount equal to the premiums certified to him or her as chargeable against that agency. The amount so debited shall be credited to an account kept by the State Treasurer and known as the state fire and tornado insurance fund. No premium shall be charged on any one (1) subject of risk upon a valuation of more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), unless the Office of the Controller in the Finance and Administration Cabinet has contracted for reinsurance that limits the liability of the fund to one million dollars ($1,000,000) upon such subject of risk.

The Office of the Controller in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prescribe a certificate setting forth the terms and conditions of coverage under the state fire and tornado insurance fund. Different forms of certificates may be used for different risks. Such certificates may contain such terms and conditions as the Office of the Controller in the Finance and Administration Cabinet may prescribe, including but not limited to a deductible, in order that there be fair allocation of significant losses and the elimination of unnecessary costs in administering the state fire and tornado insurance fund.

History.

4636-26: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 192, § 4; 1954, ch. 225, § 1; 1960, ch. 100, § 1, effective June 16, 1960; 1982, ch. 406, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 437, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 24, § 44, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Commonwealth Credit Union could properly purchase insurance covering a credit union building, when such building was completed, from the State Fire and Tornado Insurance Fund; such building, in terms of KRS 56.070(1), qualified as property “used by the state or any agency of the state.” The premium to be charged against the Commonwealth Credit Union would be determined by the Department of Insurance, pursuant to KRS

56.090

and the premium chargeable to the credit union could be taken out of the state budget appropriations to the credit union, the profits of the credit union, or a combination of both, pursuant to this section.

OAG 84-80

.

56.110.
Damage to state property — How appraised.

In case any building or other property belonging to the state or a state agency is damaged by any of the perils insured against, except as otherwise provided in KRS

56.070

to

56.180

, the agency having control or custody over the property shall within thirty (30) days certify the event to the cabinet. After receiving in any manner knowledge of the event, the cabinet shall ascertain and fix the amount of damage and file with the State Treasurer a statement thereof. If the agency having control or custody of the property disagrees with the estimate of damage, the agency and the cabinet shall each appoint one (1) member of a board of appraisers, which two (2) members shall select a third member. An award in writing, submitted by the board of appraisers to the State Treasurer, shall determine the amount of damage.

History.

4636-27: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 192, § 5; 2010, ch. 24, § 45, effective July 15, 2010.

56.120.
Payment for damages.

When the amount of damage has been determined, the State Treasurer shall debit the account of the state fire and tornado insurance fund by that amount and credit with an equal amount the account of the agency that has control or custody of the property damaged, and upon warrant from the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Treasurer shall pay to the agency the amount so credited to it, for the purpose of repairing the damage or reconstructing or replacing the damaged or destroyed property. If the agency deems it impracticable or undesirable to use the money for repair, reconstruction, or replacement of the property damaged or destroyed, it may, with the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and subject to the provisions of KRS

56.491

, expend said funds for the acquisition, repair, construction, or reconstruction of property similar to the property damaged or destroyed. No debit, credit, or payment made on account of the damage to any one (1) subject of risk, by any one (1) loss, shall be in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), unless the Office of the Controller in the Finance and Administration Cabinet has effected reinsurance upon the subject of risk such as to limit the liability of the state fire and tornado insurance fund to one million dollars ($1,000,000), and unless the excess over this amount has actually been paid into the fund by the reinsuring company or companies.

History.

4636-28: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 192, § 6; 1954, ch. 225, § 2; 1960, ch. 100, § 2; 1970, ch. 92, § 16; 1982, ch. 406, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 46, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 83, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

56.130.
Insufficient amount in fund.

If there is not in the account of the state fire and tornado insurance fund an amount sufficient to cover the damage, the State Treasurer shall debit the fund only with the amount actually to its credit at the time, and shall continue, subject to prior claims, to debit the fund by the amount of each ensuing credit to the fund, until the total damage is covered. No payments shall be made on account of such damage to any agency of the state in excess of the amount debited against the fund at the time of payment.

History.

4636-29.

56.140.
Investment of insurance fund.

The State Treasurer, with approval of every investment by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may invest the state fire and tornado insurance fund in:

Obligations of the United States government, its agencies, and Kentucky cities of the first and home rule classes;

Warrants issued on the State Treasurer;

State bonds, including bridge revenue bonds issued under KRS

180.010

to

180.250

;

Bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of any domestic corporation that is an agent or instrumentality of the state or of any city, county, or school district of the state, secured by a mortgage on real estate in Kentucky that has been conveyed to the corporation by any city, county, school district, or state educational institution, and which the corporation has leased and given the option to lease to the city, county, school district, or state educational institution, with option in the lessee to purchase the property, or an interest therein, on the payment of the aggregate sum of the bond issue, plus the expenses incident to the issuance of the bonds and the formation and dissolution of the corporation, subject to credit of the amounts paid as rental for such property; and

School bonds issued by cities under KRS

162.120

to

162.290

.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not approve investments on which there has ever been a default in payment of principal or interest preceding the date of acceptance by the State Treasurer.

All income from investments credited to the state fire and tornado insurance fund shall be credited to that fund.

History.

4636-30, 4636-31; 2014, ch. 92, § 25, effective January 1, 2015.

56.150.
Expenses of administration.

The cabinet and the State Treasurer may employ such assistance and incur such expenses as are necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS

56.070

to

56.180

. All such expenses may be debited against the state fire and tornado insurance fund, and paid on warrant of the cabinet, but the total of such expenses during any fiscal year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total receipts of the fund during the same fiscal year. If such expenses are incurred at a time when there is not a sufficient amount in the fund to pay them, they shall constitute a prior claim to be paid out of the first receipts of the fund thereafter before any damages on account of insured losses are paid.

History.

4636-32: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 192, § 7; 2010, ch. 24, § 47, effective July 15, 2010.

56.160.
Reinsurance.

The Office of the Controller in the Finance and Administration Cabinet may contract with any responsible fire and tornado insurance or reinsurance company authorized to do business in Kentucky to reinsure any subject of risk of which the total valuation has been fixed at over one million dollars ($1,000,000) in such a way as to limit the net liability of the state fire and tornado insurance fund with respect to such subject of risk to one million dollars ($1,000,000). The premium for reinsurance shall be paid out of the state fire and tornado insurance fund, on warrant of the cabinet.

History.

4636-33; amend. Acts. 1946, ch. 130, § 1; 1950, ch. 192, § 8; 1954, ch. 225, § 3; 1960, ch. 100, § 3, effective June 16, 1960; 1982, ch. 406, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 48, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 83, § 3, effective July 12, 2012.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Reinsurance contracts, filing, KRS

304.5-150

.

56.170.
Inspection for fire hazards — Adjustment of premiums.

The cabinet shall annually have an inspection made of each building and its contents owned by the state or any agency thereof, for the purpose of determining the unnecessary causes of a fire hazard therein, and shall make recommendations to the agency having control or custody of the building relative to the removal or correction of the hazard. Reasonable differences in the premium chargeable against the agency on account of the building and its contents may be made contingent upon compliance with such recommendations.

History.

4636-34; 2010, ch. 24, § 49, effective July 15, 2010.

56.180.
Fund exceeding ten million dollars — Use of fund — Disposition of excess.

If at the end of any fiscal year the moneys and securities to the credit of the state fire and tornado insurance fund exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000), any such excess shall be transferred to the general fund.

The moneys and securities to the credit of the state fire and tornado insurance fund shall not be used for any purpose unrelated to fund operations.

History.

4636-35: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 130, § 2; 1954, ch. 225, § 4; 1958, ch. 137; 1962, ch. 45; 1982, ch. 406, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 2012, ch. 83, § 4, effective July 12, 2012.

56.185.
State agencies to comply with National Flood Insurance Program requirements for new construction.

All state agencies shall comply with the requirements of the National Flood Insurance Program when constructing state buildings, structures, roads, or other facilities in a flood plain.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall issue regulations to ensure compliance with subsection (1) of this section.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall assist the Finance and Administration Cabinet in interpreting the federal law and regulations relating to the National Flood Insurance Program.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall submit to the Legislative Research Commission verification of the proper initial implementation of this section and shall annually report to the Commission on its continued implementation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 174, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 50, effective July 15, 2010.